Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.12.080

Oath and bond of officers.

Any officer before entering upon the performance of his or her duties may be required to take an oath or affirmation as prescribed by charter or by ordinance for the faithful performance of his or her duties. The oath or affirmation shall be filed with the county auditor. The clerk, treasurer, if any, chief of police, and such other officers or employees as may be designated by ordinance or by charter shall be required to furnish annually an official bond conditioned on the honest and faithful performance of their official duties. The terms and penalty of official bonds and the surety therefor shall be prescribed by ordinance or charter and the bond shall be approved by the chief administrative officer of the city. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the city. When the furnishing of an official bond is required of an officer or employee, compliance with such provisions shall be an essential part of qualification for office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3009; 1986 c 167 s 20; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.12.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.